Utah statutes.
26-8a-407.   Ground ambulance and paramedic licenses -- Proceedings.

(1)  The presiding officer shall:

(a)  commence an informal adjudicative proceeding within 120 days of receiving a completed application;

(b)  meet with the applicant and objecting interested parties and provide no less than 120 days for a negotiated resolution, consistent with the criteria in Section 26-8a-408;

(c)  set aside a separate time during the proceedings to accept public comment on the application; and

(d)  present a written decision to the executive director if a resolution has been reached that satisfies the criteria in Section 26-8a-408.

(2)  At any time during an informal adjudicative proceeding under Subsection (1), any party may request conversion of the informal adjudicative proceeding to a formal adjudicative proceeding in accordance with Section 63G-4-202.

(3)  Upon conversion to a formal adjudicative proceeding, a hearing officer shall be assigned to the application as provided in Section 26-8a-409.  The hearing office shall:

(a)  set aside a separate time during the proceedings to accept public comment on the application;

(b)  apply the criteria established in Section 26-8a-408; and

(c)  present a recommended decision to the executive director in writing.

(4)  The executive director may, as set forth in a final written order, accept, modify, reject, or remand the decision of a presiding or hearing officer after:

(a)  reviewing the record;

(b)  giving due deference to the officer's decision; and

(c)  determining whether the criteria in Section 26-8a-408 have been satisfied.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

